Colorado, session 2026A, HB1154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the offices of the governor,
lieutenant governor, and state planning and budgeting for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section
2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part V as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART V
GOVERNOR - LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR - STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING
(1) OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
(A) Governor's Office
Administration of Governor's
Office and Residence 6,473,584 5,828,510 117,866a 527,208b
(44.0 FTE)
Discretionary Fund 19,500 19,500
Mansion Activity Fund 263,266 263,266c
Office of Climate
Preparedness 470,962 470,962
(3.0 FTE)
7,227,312
a This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $274,691 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries collected by the Office of Information Technology and $252,517 shall be from statewide indirect cost
recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from rental fees for events using Mansion facilities or the Governor's Mansion Maintenance Fund created in Section 24-30-1303.8 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(B) Special Purpose
Health, Life, and Dental 5,243,251 2,092,862 1,823,003a 200,324b 1,127,062(I)
5,433,389 2,170,058 1,886,699a 208,690b 1,167,942(I)
Short-term Disability 26,027 11,129 7,745a 1,280b 5,873(I)
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 167,310 71,537 49,790a 8,226b 37,757(I)
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 3,718,015 1,589,729 1,106,450a 182,795b 839,041(I)
Salary Survey 1,017,110 432,939 304,095a 50,103b 229,973(I)
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Step Pay 250,163 105,853 74,631a 12,465b 57,214(I)
PERA Direct Distribution 675,782 440,796 201,669a 33,317b
Workers' Compensation 29,124 5,825 23,299b
Legal Services 1,240,673 1,240,673
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 143,011 28,602 114,409b
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 600,559 149,764 450,795b
Payments to OIT 2,057,477 2,057,477
2,187,916 2,187,916
CORE Operations 34,477 4,127 5,002a 20,472b 4,876(I)
Indirect Cost Assessment 4,673 4,673b
15,207,652
15,528,229
a Of these amounts, $62,668 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $3,509,717 $3,573,413 shall be from various sources of cash
funds.
b Of these amounts, $453,022 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries collected by the Colorado Department of Transportation, $409,697 shall be from statewide indirect cost
recoveries collected by the Office of Information Technology, $238,824 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries collected by the Colorado Secretary of State, and $615 $8,981
shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
(C) Colorado Energy Office
Program Administration 8,159,435 4,361,375 3,798,060(I)
(29.0 FTE)
Low-Income Energy
Assistance 11,524,618 11,524,618(I)a
(4.5 FTE)
Energy Performance for
Buildings 1,300,000 1,300,000(I)b
(2.0 FTE)
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Electric Vehicle Charging
Station Grants 1,036,204 1,036,204(I)c
Appropriation to
Decarbonization Tax Credits
Cash Fund 1,026,941 1,026,941d
(3.1 FTE)
Streamlined Solar Permitting 992,709 992,709e
Legal Services 1,523,341 1,470,963 52,378(I)
Vehicle Lease Payments 7,584 7,584
5,421 5,421
Leased Space 409,592 409,592
Indirect Cost Assessment 257,393 257,393(I)
Community Access Enterprise 19,760,850 19,760,850(I)f
(3.7 FTE)
Community Access Enterprise
Legal Services 16,178 16,178(I)f
46,014,845
46,012,682
a This amount shall be from the Colorado Energy Office Low-income Energy Assistance Fund created in Section 40-8.7-112 (3)(a), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational
purposes only because the Colorado Energy Office Low-income Energy Assistance Fund is continuously appropriated to the Office pursuant to Section 40-8.7-112 (3)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Climate Change Mitigation and Adaptation Fund created in Section 24-38.5-102.6 (1), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only
because the Climate Change Mitigation and Adaptation Fund is continuously appropriated to the Office pursuant to Section 24-38.5-102.6 (2), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Electric Vehicle Grant Fund created in Section 24-38.5-103 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only because the Electric
Vehicle Grant Fund is continuously appropriated to the Office pursuant to Section 24-38.5-103 (2), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Decarbonization Tax Credits Administration Cash Fund created in Section 24-38.5-120 (2), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from the Streamlined Solar Permitting and Inspection Cash Fund created in Section 24-38.5-119 (7)(a)(I), C.R.S.
f These amounts shall be from the Community Access Enterprise Fund created in Section 24-38.5-303 (5)(a), C.R.S. The amounts are shown for informational purposes only because
the Community Access Enterprise Fund is continuously appropriated to the Office pursuant to Section 24-38.5-303 (5)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
68,449,809
68,768,223
(2) OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
Administration 555,899 555,899
(4.0 FTE)
Discretionary Fund 2,875 2,875
Commission of Indian Affairs 518,397 517,213 1,184a
(4.0 FTE)
Commission on Community
Service 478,901 478,901
(2.0 FTE)
1,556,072
a This amount shall be from private donations.
(3) OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING
Personal Services 4,137,264 2,077,700 2,059,564a
(24.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 106,701 30,177 76,524a
Economic Forecasting
Subscriptions 16,362 16,362a
Evidence-based Policymaking
Evaluation and Support 300,000 300,000b
Infrastructure Investment and
Jobs Act Match Funding 20,250,000 20,250,000c
(4.0 FTE)
24,810,327
a These amounts shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries collected by the Colorado Department of Transportation.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the "Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act Cash Fund" created in Section 24-75-232 (3), C.R.S.
(4) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS
Administration 2,571,559 1,835,287 720,272(I)a 16,000(I)
(7.3 FTE)
Vehicle Lease Payments 9,865 9,865
9,613 9,613
Leased Space 452,653 452,653
Global Business Development 5,381,193 4,258,089 573,626b 175,000c 374,478(I)
(26.4 FTE)
Office of Outdoor Recreation 379,978 379,978
(3.0 FTE)
Leading Edge Program Grants 151,431 76,000 75,431d
Small Business Development
Centers 1,771,304 486,502 1,284,802(I)
(4.0 FTE)
Colorado Office of Film,
Television, and Media 1,325,206 742,750 582,456e
(4.5 FTE)
Colorado Promotion -
Colorado Welcome Centers 766,000 250,000 516,000f
(3.3 FTE)
Colorado Promotion - Other
Program Costs 18,651,159 3,833,161 14,817,998f
(4.0 FTE)
Destination Development
Program 1,100,000 500,000 600,000f
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Economic Development
Commission - General
Economic Incentives and
Marketing 6,196,339 5,976,339 220,000(I)g
(10.6 FTE)
Colorado First Customized
Job Training 1,456,499 1,456,499
CAPCO Administration 13,500 13,500h
(0.3 FTE)
Council on Creative Industries 4,711,013 1,382,279 2,563,000i 765,734(I)
(4.5 FTE)
Advanced Industries 15,362,210 15,362,210(I)j
(2.6 FTE)
Rural Jump Start 40,491 40,491
(0.5 FTE)
Rural Opportunity Office 732,609 579,609 153,000k
(5.5 FTE)
Employee Ownership Office 146,383 146,383
(1.3 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 208,880 208,880l
61,428,272
61,428,020
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds. This amount is shown for informational purposes only because a portion of these funds come from continuously appropriated
cash funds.
b Of this amount, an estimated $175,000(I) shall be from the Advanced Industries Export Acceleration Cash Fund created in Section 24-47-103 (8)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $50,000 shall
be from the Minority Business Fund created in Section 24-49.5-104 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $348,626 shall be from various fees collected from participants in activities conducted
by the division.
c This amount shall be from the Advanced Industries Export Acceleration Cash Fund created in Section 24-47-103 (8)(a), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from fees, Small Business Development Centers' activities, and grants and donations.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
e This amount shall be from the Colorado Office of Film, Television, and Media Operational Account Cash Fund created in Section 24-48.5-116 (5)(a), C.R.S.
f These amounts shall be from the Colorado Travel and Tourism Promotion Fund created in Section 24-49.7-106 (1), C.R.S.
g This amount shall be from the Procurement Technical Assistance Cash Fund created in Section 24-48.5-121 (8), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only
because the Procurement Technical Assistance Cash Fund is continuously appropriated to the Office pursuant to Section 24-48.5-121 (8)(b), C.R.S.
h This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Regulatory Agencies from the Transfer to CAPCO line item appropriation.
i This amount shall be from the Creative Industries Cash Fund created in Section 24-48.5-301 (2)(a), C.R.S.
j This amount shall be from the Advanced Industries Acceleration Cash Fund created in Section 24-48.5-117 (7)(a), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only
because the Advanced Industries Acceleration Cash Fund is continuously appropriated to the Office pursuant to Section 24-48.5-117 (7)(c)(I), C.R.S.
k This amount shall be from unspent grant funds appropriated to the Rural Opportunity Office.
l This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(5) OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
(A) OIT Central Administration
Central Administration 28,082,027 2,042,861 2,500,000(I)a 23,539,166b
25,313,854 20,770,993b
(6.5 FTE) (134.5 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 15,327,747 286,410 35,825c 15,005,512b
15,823,685 295,833 36,817c 15,491,035b
Short-term Disability 83,313 1,522 149c 81,642b
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 540,676 9,786 957c 529,933b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 12,015,032 217,476 21,249c 11,776,307b
Salary Survey 3,316,141 59,464 5,840c 3,250,837b
Step Pay 819,050 20,979 944c 797,127b
PERA Direct Distribution 2,285,776 41,036 4,009c 2,240,731b
Shift Differential 179,163 179,163b
Workers' Compensation 152,901 152,901b
Legal Services 508,934 25,971 482,963b
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 1,133,875 1,133,875b
Leased Space 474,197 474,197b
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 701,979 701,979b
CORE Operations 46,001 46,001b
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,904,333 1,904,333b
67,571,145
65,298,910
a This amount shall be from the Technology Risk Prevention and Response Fund created in Section 24-37.5-120 (2), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only because
the Technology Risk Prevention and Response Fund is continuously appropriated to the Office pursuant to Section 24-37.5-120 (4)(a), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from user fees collected from other state agencies and deposited in the Information Technology Revolving Fund created in Section 24-37.5-103 (3)(a),
C.R.S.
c These shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(B) Enterprise Solutions 213,099,030 3,056,362 622,292a 209,420,376b
204,503,124 200,824,470b
(11.7 FTE) (2.0 FTE) (469.5 FTE)
a Of this amount, $453,812 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $9,200 shall be from the Mobile Home Park Act Dispute Resolution
and Enforcement Program Cash Fund created in Section 38-12-1110 (1), C.R.S., $2,328 shall be from user fees collected from various local governments and deposited in the Information
Technology Revolving Fund created in Section 24-37.5-103 (3)(a), C.R.S., and $156,952 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be from user fees collected from other state agencies and deposited in the Information Technology Revolving Fund created in Section 24-37.5-103 (3)(a), C.R.S.
(C) Information Security 29,419,490 29,419,490a
28,399,637 28,399,637a
(77.0 FTE)
a This amount shall be from user fees collected from other state agencies and deposited in the Information Technology Revolving Fund created in Section 24-37.5-103 (3)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(D) Colorado Benefits
Management System17 20,593,400 20,588,827a 4,573(I)
a This amount shall be from fees collected from user agencies and deposited in the Information Technology Revolving Fund created in Section 24-37.5-103 (3)(a), C.R.S.
(E) Customer Service and
Support 57,671,921 336,248 57,335,673a
55,486,520 55,150,272a
(2.0 FTE) (363.0 FTE)
a This amount shall be from fees collected from user agencies and deposited in the Information Technology Revolving Fund created in Section 24-37.5-103 (3)(a), C.R.S.
388,354,986
374,281,591
TOTALS PART V
(GOVERNOR-
LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR- STATE
PLANNING AND
BUDGETING) $544,599,466 $52,966,564 $97,880,358a $384,897,330 $8,855,214b
$530,844,233 $53,181,207 $97,945,046a $370,821,886 $8,896,094b
a Of this amount, $51,500,060 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
17 Governor - Lieutenant Governor - State Planning and Budgeting, Office of Information Technology, Colorado Benefits Management System -- Of this
appropriation, $5,000,000 remains available until the close of the 2026-27 fiscal year.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1154

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1154